Washington statutes.
RCW 21.40.070

Determination of award amount—Factors.

In determining the amount of an award under this chapter, the securities administrator shall consider:

(1) The significance of the original information provided by the whistleblower to the success of the administrative or judicial action;

(2) The degree of assistance provided by the whistleblower in connection with the administrative or judicial action;

(3) The programmatic interest of the securities administrator in deterring violations of the securities laws by making awards to whistleblowers who provide original information that leads to the successful enforcement of such laws; and

(4) Any other factors the securities administrator considers relevant.

[ 2023 c 149 s 8.]